Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1156.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 662a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an individual riding an electric bicycle is subject to the same requirements under this act as an individual riding a bicycle. (2) Beginning on January 1, 2018, a A manufacturer or distributor of electric bicycles offered for sale or distribution in this state shall permanently affix in a prominent location on the electric bicycle a label that contains the classification number, top assisted speed, and motor wattage of the electric bicycle. The label required under this subsection shall be printed in Arial font and shall be at least 9-point type. (3) A person shall not tamper with or modify an electric bicycle so as to change the manufactured motor-powered speed capability or motor engagement of the electric bicycle without replacing the label required under subsection (2) with an appropriate label printed in Arial font and in at least 9-point type. For purposes of this act, a device shall not be considered an electric bicycle if the motor is modified in a manner that no longer meets the criteria described in section 13e, or if the motor exceeds 750 watts. (4) All of the following apply to a class 3 electric bicycle: (a) A class 3 electric bicycle shall not be operated by an individual less than 14 years of age. An individual less than 14 years of age may ride as a passenger on a class 3 electric bicycle that is designed to accommodate passengers. (b) An individual less than 18 years of age who operates or rides as a passenger on a class 3 electric bicycle shall wear a properly fitted and fastened bicycle helmet that meets federal standards established by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission or the American Society for Testing and Materials. (5) An electric bicycle shall comply with applicable equipment and manufacturing requirements for electric bicycles established under federal law, including standards adopted by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission and compiled in 16 CFR part 1512. (6) An individual less than 14 years of age shall not operate an electric bicycle on a public road, sidewalk, or trail. (7) An individual older than 14 years of age but less than 18 years of age may ride an electric bicycle on a public road, sidewalk, or trail, if both of the following conditions are met: (a) The individual is wearing a properly fitted and fastened bicycle helmet that meets federal standards established by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission or the American Society for Testing and Materials. (b) A parent or legal guardian of the individual has either provided written permission for the individual to ride the electric bicycle or the parent or legal guardian of the individual is present and supervising the individual. (8) (6) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7), (9), an individual may operate an electric bicycle on any part of a highway that is open to a bicycle, including, but not limited to, a lane designated for the exclusive use of bicycles and the shoulder. (9) (7) An individual shall not operate an electric bicycle within a city that prohibits the use of nonemergency motor vehicles, unless the city council of that city, by majority vote, adopts a resolution allowing the operation of electric bicycles within city limits. An individual shall not operate an electric bicycle within the Mackinac Island State Park, unless he or she the individual has obtained the required permit from the Mackinac Island State Park Commission created in part 767 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.76701 to 324.76709, or unless the Mackinac Island State Park Commission authorizes the operation of electric bicycles within its jurisdiction. If a city described in this subsection or the Mackinac Island State Park Commission authorizes the operation of electric bicycles within its jurisdiction, the city or the Mackinac Island State Park Commission may regulate the operation of electric bicycles within its jurisdiction. (10) (8) An individual may operate a class 1 electric bicycle on a linear trail that has an asphalt, crushed limestone, or similar surface, or a rail trail. A local authority or agency of this state having jurisdiction over a trail described in this subsection may regulate or prohibit the operation of a class 1 electric bicycle on that trail. (11) (9) An individual may operate a class 2 or class 3 electric bicycle on a linear trail that has an asphalt, crushed limestone, or similar surface, or a rail trail if authorized by the local authority or agency of this state having jurisdiction over the trail. (12) (10) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an individual shall not operate an electric bicycle on a trail that is designated as nonmotorized and that has a natural surface tread that is made by clearing and grading the native soil with no added surfacing materials. A local authority or agency of this state having jurisdiction over a trail described in this subsection may allow and regulate the operation of an electric bicycle on that trail. (13) (11) This state or a local authority or agency of this state shall administer the provisions of this section in a manner that complies with the Americans with disabilities act of 1990, Public Law 101-336, and the persons with disabilities civil rights act, 1976 PA 220, MCL 37.1101 to 37.1607. (14) (12) Before an entity described in subsections (7) (9) to (10) (12) may prohibit, authorize, or regulate the use of electric bicycles within its jurisdiction, that entity shall hold a public hearing on the matter. (15) (13) Subsections (6) to (10) (12) do not apply to the use of electric bicycles on a congressionally authorized public trail system. (16) An individual shall not knowingly allow a minor to operate an electric bicycle in violation of either subsection (6) or (7). (17) An individual less than 18 years of age that violates either subsection (6) or (7) is subject to the following: (a) For a first violation, a warning and an order to attend a mandatory safety education class. (b) For a second or subsequent violation, a civil fine of not more than $100.00 and possible impoundment of the electric bicycle. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred, or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. (18) An individual that violates subsection (16) is responsible for a state civil infraction and may be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $250.00. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred, or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.